Massachusetts, session 194th, H1837.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 90, the word “five” and inserting in 
place thereof the following word:- 10. 
SECTION 2. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 110, the word “seven” and inserting 
in place thereof the following word:- 20.  
SECTION 3. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 112, the word “ten” and inserting in 
place thereof the following word:- 20. 

of 2 10  SECTION 4. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 114, the words “fifteen years” and 
inserting in place thereof the following words:- life imprisonment. 
SECTION 5. Section 10 of Chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 138 after the after the word “years”:- or 
not less than 3 nor more than 10 years in state prison. And striking out the words “or by a fine of 
not more than five hundred dollars.” 
SECTION 6. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 156, the word “5” and inserting in 
place thereof the following word:- 20. 
SECTION 7. Section 10 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 201, the word “ten” and inserting in 
place thereof the following word:- 20. 
SECTION 8. Section 128 of Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 11, the word “ten” and inserting in 
place thereof the following word:- 20.